en: Laboratory Specimens
xx: Laboratory Specimens
cs: Laboratorní nádobky na vzorky
da: Laboratorieprøver
de: Laborproben
es: Muestras de laboratorio
fr: Spécimens de laboratoire
it: Campioni di laboratorio
ja: 検査検体
nl: Laboratoriumspecimens
no: Laboratorieprøver
pl: Preparaty laboratoryjne
pt: Espécimes de laboratório
ru: Лабораторные образцы
sv: Labbprov
tr: Laboratuvar Numuneleri

en: Laboratory Supplies
xx: Laboratory Supplies
cs: Laboratorní potřeby
da: Laboratorie – tilbehør
de: Laborbedarf
es: Productos de laboratorio
fr: Accessoires de laboratoire
it: Articoli da laboratorio
ja: 実験用品
nl: Laboratoriumbenodigdheden
no: Laboratoriemateriell
pl: Akcesoria laboratoryjne
pt: Suprimentos de laboratório
ru: Лабораторные принадлежности
sv: Laboratoriematerial
tr: Laboratuvar Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Beakers
xx: Beakers
cs: Kádinky
da: Bægerglas
de: Bechergläse
es: Vasos de laboratorio
fr: Béchers
it: Becher
ja: ビーカー
nl: Bekers
no: Begerglass
pl: Zlewki
pt: Provetas
ru: Лабораторные стаканы
sv: Laboratoriebägare
tr: Beherglaslar

en: Graduated Cylinders
xx: Graduated Cylinders
cs: Odměrné válce
da: Målecylindre
de: Messzylinder
es: Probetas
fr: Éprouvettes graduées
it: Cilindri graduati
ja: メスシリンダー
nl: Maatcilinders
no: Målesylindere
pl: Cylindry miarowe
pt: Cilindros graduados
ru: Мерные цилиндры
sv: Graderade cylindrar
tr: Dereceli Silindirler

en: Laboratory Flasks
xx: Laboratory Flasks
cs: Laboratorní baňky
da: Laboratorie – flasker
de: Laborkolben
es: Matraces de laboratorio
fr: Flacons de laboratoire
it: Beute da laboratorio
ja: フラスコ
nl: Laboratoriumkolven
no: Laboratoriekolber
pl: Kolby laboratoryjne
pt: Frascos de laboratório
ru: Лабораторные колбы
sv: Laboratorieflaskor
tr: Laboratuvar Balonları

en: Petri Dishes
xx: Petri Dishes
cs: Petriho misky
da: Petriskåle
de: Petrischalen
es: Placas de Petri
fr: Boîtes de Petri
it: Piastre di Petri
ja: シャーレ
nl: Petrischalen
no: Petriskåler
pl: Szalki Petriego
pt: Placa de Petri
ru: Чашки Петри
sv: Petriskålar
tr: Petri Kapları

en: Pipettes
xx: Pipettes
cs: Pipety
da: Pipetter
de: Pipetten
es: Pipetas
fr: Pipettes
it: Pipette
ja: ピペット
nl: Pipetten
no: Dråpetellere
pl: Pipety
pt: Pipetas
ru: Пипетки
sv: Pipetter
tr: Pipetler

en: Test Tube Racks
xx: Test Tube Racks
cs: Stojany na zkumavky
da: Reagensglasholdere
de: Reagenzglasständer
es: Soportes tubos de ensayo
fr: Supports de tubes à essais
it: Portaprovette
ja: 試験管立て
nl: Rekken voor reageerbuisjes
no: Reagensrørstativer
pl: Statywy do probówek
pt: Estantes para tubos de ensaio
ru: Штативы для пробирок
sv: Provrörsställ
tr: Deney Tüpü Rafları

en: Test Tubes
xx: Test Tubes
cs: Zkumavky
da: Reagensglas
de: Reagenzgläser
es: Tubos de ensayo
fr: Tubes à essais
it: Provette
ja: 試験管
nl: Reageerbuisjes
no: Reagensrør
pl: Probówki
pt: Tubos de ensaio
ru: Пробирки
sv: Provrör
tr: Deney Tüpleri

en: Wash Bottles
xx: Wash Bottles
cs: Mycí lahvičky
da: Flasker til sårrensning
de: Spritzflaschen
es: Pizetas
fr: Pissettes
it: Spruzzette
ja: 洗浄瓶
nl: Wasflessen
no: Sprøyteflasker
pl: Tryskawki
pt: Frascos de lavagem
ru: Промывные склянки
sv: Tvättflaskor
tr: Yıkama Şişeleri

en: Signage
xx: Signage
cs: Značení
da: Skiltning
de: Beschilderung
es: Avisos
fr: Signalétique
it: Segnaletica
ja: 看板・標識
nl: Gevel- en uitgangborden
no: Skilting
pl: Informacja wizualna
pt: Sinalização
ru: Знаки и обозначения
sv: Skyltar
tr: İşaret ve Tabelalar

en: Business Hour Signs
xx: Business Hour Signs
cs: Vývěsky s otevírací dobou
da: Skilte til åbningstider
de: Öffnungszeiten-Schilder
es: Carteles de horarios laborales
fr: Panneaux d'horaires
it: Cartelli con orario di apertura
ja: 営業時間案内プレート
nl: Openingstijdenbordjes
no: Skilter for åpningstider
pl: Tablice z godzinami otwarcia
pt: Placas de horário de funcionamento
ru: Вывески с часами работы
sv: Skyltar med öppettider
tr: İş Saati Levhaları

en: Digital Signs
xx: Digital Signs
cs: Digitální značení
da: Digitale skilte
de: Digitale Schilder
es: Rótulos digitales
fr: Enseignes numériques
it: Cartelli digitali
ja: デジタルサイネージ
nl: Digitale borden
no: Digitale skilt
pl: Monitory informacyjne
pt: Placas digitais
ru: Цифровые вывески
sv: Digitala skyltar
tr: Dijital Tabelalar

en: Electric Signs
xx: Electric Signs
cs: Elektrické poutače
da: Elektroniske skilte
de: Elektronische Schilder
es: Señales eléctricas
fr: Enseignes électriques
it: Insegne elettriche
ja: 電飾看板
nl: Elektrische borden
no: Elektriske skilt
pl: Znaki elektroniczne
pt: Placas de sinalização eletrônicas
ru: Электрические вывески
sv: Elektriska skyltar
tr: Elektronik Tabelalar

en: LED Signs
xx: LED Signs
cs: LED značky
da: LED-skilte
de: LED-Schilder
es: Señales LED
fr: Enseignes LED
it: Insegne a LED
ja: LED看板
nl: LED-borden
no: LED-skilt
pl: Znaki LED
pt: Placas de anúncios com LED
ru: Светодиодные вывески
sv: Lysdiodskyltar
tr: LED Tabelalar

en: Neon Signs
xx: Neon Signs
cs: Neonové značky
da: Neonskilte
de: Neonschilder
es: Señales de neón
fr: Enseignes néon
it: Insegne al neon
ja: ネオン看板
nl: Neonborden
no: Neonskilt
pl: Neony
pt: Placas de anúncio com neon
ru: Неоновые вывески
sv: Neonskyltar
tr: Neon Tabelalar

en: Emergency & Exit Signs
xx: Emergency & Exit Signs
cs: Tabulky pro nouzové situace a označení východu
da: Advarsels-\, nødudgangs- og udgangsskilte
de: Notfall- & Notausgangsschilder
es: Señales de emergencia y salida
fr: Panneaux de secours et d'évacuation
it: Segnaletica di emergenza e di uscita
ja: 非常口標識
nl: Noodseinen en nooduitgangsborden
no: Nød- og utgangsskilt
pl: Znaki awaryjne i ewakuacyjne
pt: Placas de emergência e saída
ru: Аварийные знаки и знаки выхода
sv: Nödskyltar och nödutgångsskyltar
tr: Acil Durum ve Çıkış Tabelaları

en: Facility Identification Signs
xx: Facility Identification Signs
cs: Tabulky pro informační značení
da: Identifikationsskilte
de: Wegweiser
es: Señales de identificación de instalaciones
fr: Panneaux de signalétique intérieure
it: Segnali di identificazione luoghi di interesse
ja: 施設用標識
nl: Identificatiemeldingen voor faciliteiten
no: Skilt for identifisering av fasiliteter
pl: Znaki informacyjne w budynkach
pt: Placas de identificação de instalação
ru: Знаки идентификации помещений
sv: Företagsskyltar
tr: Tesis Tabelaları

en: Open & Closed Signs
xx: Open & Closed Signs
cs: Vývěsky s nápisem otevřeno/zavřeno
da: Skilte til Åbent og Lukket
de: Geöffnet- und Geschlossen-Schilder
es: Carteles de abierto y cerrado
fr: Panneaux d'ouverture et de fermeture
it: Cartelli di aperto/chiuso
ja: 営業案内プレート
nl: Open- en gesloten-bordjes
no: Informasjonsskilt – åpent/stengt
pl: Szyldy „Otwarte” i „Zamknięte”
pt: Placas de aberto e fechado
ru: Знаки "Открыто" и "Закрыто"
sv: Skyltar med öppet- och stängttider
tr: Açık ve Kapalı Levhaları

en: Parking Signs & Permits
xx: Parking Signs & Permits
cs: Parkovací značky a povolení
da: Parkeringsskilte og tilladelser
de: Parkplatzschilder
es: Señales de estacionamiento y vados
fr: Panneaux de parking et de stationnement
it: Segnali di parcheggio e permessi
ja: 駐車標識
nl: Parkeerborden en -vergunningen
no: Parkeringsskilt og -tillatelser
pl: Znaki parkingowe i zezwolenia
pt: Placas de estacionamento e permissões
ru: Знаки автостоянки
sv: Parkeringsskyltar och parkeringstillstånd
tr: Park Tabelaları ve İzinleri